Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.625

Medical cannabis authorization database.

Records in the medical cannabis authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230 containing names and other personally identifiable information of qualifying patients and designated providers are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 16 s 30; 2015 c 70 s 22.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Effective date—2015 c 70 ss 21, 22, 32, and 33: See note following RCW 69.51A.230.

Short title—Findings—Intent—References to Washington state liquor control board—Draft legislation—2015 c 70: See notes following RCW 66.08.012.